Illinois, session 104th, HB4950.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Contract Fraud Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 545/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.52)7    Sec. 2. Spending money without obtaining title to land; 8approval of title by Attorney General. 9    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 2 of the 10Superconducting Super Collider Act or for projects constructed 11under the Bikeway Act, any person or persons, commissioner or 12commissioners, or other officer or officers, entrusted with 13the construction or repair of any public work or improvement, 14as set forth in Section 1, who shall expend or cause to be 15expended upon such public work or improvement, the whole or 16any part of the moneys appropriated therefor, or who shall 17commence work, or in any way authorize work to be commenced, 18thereon, without first having obtained a title, by purchase, 19donation, condemnation or otherwise, to all lands needed for 20such public work or improvement, running to the People of the 21State of Illinois; such title to be approved by the Attorney 22General, and his approval certified by the Secretary of State 23and placed on record in his office, shall be deemed guilty of a   HB4950 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1Class A misdemeanor.2    (b) Approval of title by the Attorney General for all 3lands needed for a public work or improvement shall not be 4required as established under subsection (a) of this Section 5and the State Comptroller may draw warrant in payment of 6consideration for all such lands without requiring approval of 7title by the Attorney General if consideration to be paid does 8not exceed $25,000 and the title acquired for such lands is 9for:10        (1) a fee simple title or easement acquired by the 11    State for highway right-of-way; or12        (2) an acquisition of rights or easements of access, 13    crossing, light, air or view to, from or over a freeway 14    vested in abutting property; or 15        (3) a fee simple title or easement used to place 16    utility lines and connect a permanent public work or 17    improvement owned by the State to main utility lines; or18        (4) for the purpose of flood relief or other water 19    resource projects.20    (c) This Section does not apply to any otherwise lawful 21expenditures for the construction, completion, remodeling, 22maintenance and equipment of buildings and other facilities 23made in connection with and upon premises owned by the 24Illinois Building Authority, nor shall this Section apply to 25improvements to real estate leased by any State agency as 26defined in the Illinois State Auditing Act, provided the   HB4950 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1leasehold improvements were contracted for by an agency with 2leasing authority and in compliance with the rules and 3regulations promulgated by such agency for that purpose.4    (d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Department of 5Transportation may proceed with bidding or awarding a contract 6or any construction activities once it has complied with the 7requirements for conditional certification under 23 CFR 8635.309(c)(3).9    The Department of Transportation shall comply with the 10requirements under subsection (a) before expending funds on 11construction activities or property acquisition related to 12parcels that were outstanding at the time of conditional 13certification under this subsection (d).14    No construction activities shall be undertaken on any 15property until the requirements under subsection (a) have been 16met for that property. No delay costs shall be assessed 17against the State until the Department of Transportation has 18complied with subsection (a).19(Source: P.A. 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 20    Section 10. The Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 212002 is amended by changing Sections 1-10 and 5-5 as follows: 22    (225 ILCS 458/1-10)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)24    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the   HB4950 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1context otherwise requires:2    "Accredited college or university, junior college, or 3community college" means a college or university, junior 4college, or community college that is approved or accredited 5by the Board of Higher Education, a regional or national 6accreditation association, or by an accrediting agency that is 7recognized by the U.S. Secretary of Education. 8    "Address of record" means the designated street address, 9which may not be a post office box, recorded by the Department 10in the applicant's or licensee's application file or license 11file as maintained by the Department.12    "Applicant" means a person who applies to the Department 13for a license under this Act.14    "Appraisal" means (noun) the act or process of developing 15an opinion of value; an opinion of value (adjective) of or 16pertaining to appraising and related functions, such as 17appraisal practice or appraisal services.18    "Appraisal assignment" means a valuation service provided 19pursuant to an agreement between an appraiser and a client.20    "Appraisal firm" means an appraisal entity that is 100% 21owned and controlled by a person or persons licensed in 22Illinois as a certified general real estate appraiser or a 23certified residential real estate appraiser. "Appraisal firm" 24does not include an appraisal management company. 25    "Appraisal management company" means any corporation, 26limited liability company, partnership, sole proprietorship,   HB4950 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1subsidiary, unit, or other business entity that directly or 2indirectly: (1) provides appraisal management services to 3creditors or secondary mortgage market participants, including 4affiliates; (2) provides appraisal management services in 5connection with valuing the consumer's principal dwelling as 6security for a consumer credit transaction (including consumer 7credit transactions incorporated into securitizations); and 8(3) any appraisal management company that, within a given 912-month period, oversees an appraiser panel of 16 or more 10State-certified appraisers in Illinois or 25 or more 11State-certified or State-licensed appraisers in 2 or more 12jurisdictions. "Appraisal management company" includes a 13hybrid entity. 14    "Appraisal practice" means valuation services performed by 15an individual acting as an appraiser, including, but not 16limited to, appraisal or appraisal review. 17    "Appraisal qualification board (AQB)" means the 18independent board of the Appraisal Foundation, which, under 19the provisions of Title XI of the Financial Institutions 20Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, establishes the 21minimum education, experience, and examination requirements 22for real property appraisers to obtain a state certification 23or license. 24    "Appraisal report" means any communication, written or 25oral, of an appraisal or appraisal review that is transmitted 26to a client upon completion of an assignment.  HB4950 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1    "Appraisal review" means the act or process of developing 2and communicating an opinion about the quality of another 3appraiser's work that was performed as part of an appraisal, 4appraisal review, or appraisal assignment. 5    "Appraisal Subcommittee" means the Appraisal Subcommittee 6of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council as 7established by Title XI.8    "Appraiser" means a person who performs real estate or 9real property appraisals competently and in a manner that is 10independent, impartial, and objective.11    "Appraiser panel" means a network, list, or roster of 12licensed or certified appraisers approved by the appraisal 13management company or by the end-user client to perform 14appraisals as independent contractors for the appraisal 15management company. "Appraiser panel" includes both appraisers 16accepted by an appraisal management company for consideration 17for future appraisal assignments and appraisers engaged by an 18appraisal management company to perform one or more 19appraisals. For the purposes of determining the size of an 20appraiser panel, only independent contractors of hybrid 21entities shall be counted towards the appraiser panel. 22    "Associate real estate trainee appraiser" means an 23entry-level appraiser who holds a license of this 24classification under this Act with restrictions as to the 25scope of practice in accordance with this Act.26    "Automated valuation model" means an automated system that   HB4950 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1is used to derive a property value through the use of available 2property records and various analytic methodologies such as 3comparable sales prices, home characteristics, and price 4changes. 5    "Board" means the Real Estate Appraisal Administration and 6Disciplinary Board.7    "Broker price opinion" means an estimate or analysis of 8the probable selling price of a particular interest in real 9estate, which may provide a varying level of detail about the 10property's condition, market, and neighborhood and information 11on comparable sales. The activities of a real estate broker or 12managing broker engaging in the ordinary course of business as 13a broker, as defined in this Section, shall not be considered a 14broker price opinion if no compensation is paid to the broker 15or managing broker, other than compensation based upon the 16sale or rental of real estate. 17    "Classroom hour" means 50 minutes of instruction out of 18each 60-minute segment of coursework.19    "Client" means the party or parties who engage an 20appraiser by employment or contract in a specific appraisal 21assignment.22    "Comparative market analysis" is an analysis or opinion 23regarding pricing, marketing, or financial aspects relating to 24a specified interest or interests in real estate that may be 25based upon an analysis of comparative market data, the 26expertise of the real estate broker or managing broker, and   HB4950 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1such other factors as the broker or managing broker may deem 2appropriate in developing or preparing such analysis or 3opinion. The activities of a real estate broker or managing 4broker engaging in the ordinary course of business as a 5broker, as defined in this Section, shall not be considered a 6comparative market analysis if no compensation is paid to the 7broker or managing broker, other than compensation based upon 8the sale or rental of real estate. 9    "Coordinator" means the Real Estate Appraisal Coordinator 10created in Section 25-15. 11    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 12Professional Regulation. 13    "Email address of record" means the designated email 14address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 15application file or the licensee's license file maintained by 16the Department. 17    "Evaluation" means a valuation permitted by the appraisal 18regulations of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination 19Council and its federal agencies for transactions that qualify 20for the appraisal threshold exemption, business loan 21exemption, or subsequent transaction exemption.22    "Federal financial institutions regulatory agencies" means 23the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the 24Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Office of the 25Comptroller of the Currency, the Consumer Financial Protection 26Bureau, and the National Credit Union Administration.  HB4950 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1    "Federally related transaction" means any real 2estate-related financial transaction in which a federal 3financial institutions regulatory agency engages in, contracts 4for, or regulates and requires the services of an appraiser.5    "Financial institution" means any bank, savings bank, 6savings and loan association, credit union, mortgage broker, 7mortgage banker, licensee under the Consumer Installment Loan 8Act or the Sales Finance Agency Act, or a corporate fiduciary, 9subsidiary, affiliate, parent company, or holding company of 10any such licensee, or any institution involved in real estate 11financing that is regulated by state or federal law.12    "Hybrid entity" means an appraisal management company that 13hires an appraiser as an employee to perform an appraisal and 14engages an independent contractor to perform an appraisal.15    "License" means the privilege conferred by the Department 16to a person that has fulfilled all requirements prerequisite 17to any type of licensure under this Act.18    "Licensee" means any person licensed under this Act. 19    "Multi-state licensing system" means a web-based platform 20that allows an applicant to submit the application or license 21renewal application to the Department online. 22    "Person" means an individual, entity, sole proprietorship, 23corporation, limited liability company, partnership, and joint 24venture, foreign or domestic, except that when the context 25otherwise requires, the term may refer to more than one 26individual or other described entity.   HB4950 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1    "Real estate" means an identified parcel or tract of land, 2including any improvements.3    "Real estate related financial transaction" means any 4transaction involving:5        (1) the sale, lease, purchase, investment in, or 6    exchange of real property, including interests in property 7    or the financing thereof;8        (2) the refinancing of real property or interests in 9    real property; and10        (3) the use of real property or interest in property 11    as security for a loan or investment, including mortgage 12    backed securities.13    "Real property" means the interests, benefits, and rights 14inherent in the ownership of real estate.15    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 16Professional Regulation or the Secretary's designee. 17    "State certified general real estate appraiser" means an 18appraiser who holds a license of this classification under 19this Act and such classification applies to the appraisal of 20all types of real property without restrictions as to the 21scope of practice.22    "State certified residential real estate appraiser" means 23an appraiser who holds a license of this classification under 24this Act and such classification applies to the appraisal of 25one to 4 units of residential real property without regard to 26transaction value or complexity, but with restrictions as to   HB4950 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1the scope of practice in a federally related transaction in 2accordance with Title XI, the provisions of USPAP, criteria 3established by the AQB, and further defined by rule.4    "Supervising appraiser" means either (i) an appraiser who 5holds a valid license under this Act as either a State 6certified general real estate appraiser or a State certified 7residential real estate appraiser, who co-signs an appraisal 8report for an associate real estate trainee appraiser or (ii) 9a State certified general real estate appraiser who holds a 10valid license under this Act who co-signs an appraisal report 11for a State certified residential real estate appraiser on 12properties other than one to 4 units of residential real 13property without regard to transaction value or complexity. 14    "Title XI" means Title XI of the federal Financial 15Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.16    "USPAP" means the Uniform Standards of Professional 17Appraisal Practice as promulgated by the Appraisal Standards 18Board pursuant to Title XI and by rule.19    "Valuation services" means services pertaining to aspects 20of property value. 21    "Waiver valuation" means a valuation prepared pursuant to 22the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 23Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended, or pursuant to 24the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 25Acquisition for Federal and Federally Assisted Programs 26regulations under 49 CFR Part 24, which is not an appraisal and   HB4950 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1may not be represented to be an appraisal. 2(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 3102-970, eff. 5-27-22; 103-236, eff. 1-1-24.) 4    (225 ILCS 458/5-5)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)6    Sec. 5-5. Necessity of license; use of title; exemptions. 7    (a) It is unlawful for a person to (i) act, offer services, 8or advertise services as a State certified general real estate 9appraiser, State certified residential real estate appraiser, 10or associate real estate trainee appraiser, (ii) develop a 11real estate appraisal, (iii) practice as a real estate 12appraiser, or (iv) advertise as a real estate appraiser 13without a license issued under this Act. A person who violates 14this subsection is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first 15offense and a Class 4 felony for any subsequent offense.16    (a-5) It is unlawful for a person, unless registered as an 17appraisal management company, to solicit clients or enter into 18an appraisal engagement with clients without either a 19certified residential real estate appraiser license or a 20certified general real estate appraiser license issued under 21this Act. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a 22Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony 23for any subsequent offense. 24    (b) It is unlawful for a person, other than a person who 25holds a valid license issued pursuant to this Act as a State   HB4950 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1certified general real estate appraiser, a State certified 2residential real estate appraiser, or an associate real estate 3trainee appraiser to use these titles or any other title, 4designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression 5that the person is licensed as a real estate appraiser 6pursuant to this Act. A person who violates this subsection is 7guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 84 felony for any subsequent offense.9    (c) This Act does not apply to a person who holds a valid 10license as a real estate broker or managing broker pursuant to 11the Real Estate License Act of 2000 who prepares or provides a 12broker price opinion or comparative market analysis in 13compliance with Section 10-45 of the Real Estate License Act 14of 2000.15    (d) Nothing in this Act shall preclude a State certified 16general real estate appraiser, a State certified residential 17real estate appraiser, or an associate real estate trainee 18appraiser from rendering appraisals for or on behalf of a 19partnership, association, corporation, firm, or group. 20However, no State appraisal license or certification shall be 21issued under this Act to a partnership, association, 22corporation, firm, or group. 23    (e) This Act does not apply to a county assessor, township 24assessor, multi-township assessor, county supervisor of 25assessments, or any deputy or employee of any county assessor, 26township assessor, multi-township assessor, or county   HB4950 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1supervisor of assessments in performance of respective duties 2in accordance with the provisions of the Property Tax Code. 3    (e-5) For the purposes of this Act, waiver valuations 4valuation waivers may be prepared by a licensed appraiser 5notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, and the 6following types of valuations are not appraisals and may not 7be represented to be appraisals, and a license or 8certification is not required under this Act to perform such 9valuations if the valuations are created in one of the 10following manners: performed by (1) an employee of the 11Illinois Department of Transportation who has completed a 12minimum of 45 hours of course work in real estate appraisal, 13including the principles of real estate appraisals, appraisal 14of partial acquisitions, easement valuation, reviewing 15appraisals in eminent domain, appraisal for federal aid 16highway programs, and appraisal review for federal aid highway 17programs and has at least 2 years' experience in a field 18closely related to real estate; (2) a county engineer who is a 19registered professional engineer under the Professional 20Engineering Practice Act of 1989; (3) an employee of a 21municipality who has (i) completed a minimum of 45 hours of 22coursework in real estate appraisal, including the principles 23of real estate appraisals, appraisal of partial acquisitions, 24easement valuation, reviewing appraisals in eminent domain, 25appraisal for federal aid highway programs, and appraisal 26review for federal aid highway programs and (ii) has either 2   HB4950 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1years' experience in a field clearly related to real estate or 2has completed 20 hours of additional coursework that is 3sufficient for a person to complete waiver valuations as 4approved by the Federal Highway Administration; or (4) a 5municipal engineer who has completed coursework that is 6sufficient for waiver valuations to be approved by the Federal 7Highway Administration and who is a registered professional 8engineer under the Professional Engineering Act of 1989, under 9the following circumstances: 10        (A) a waiver valuation waiver in an amount not to 11    exceed $35,000 that $20,000 prepared pursuant to the 12    federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 13    Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, or prepared pursuant to 14    the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real 15    Property Acquisition for Federal and Federally-Assisted 16    Programs regulations and which is performed by:17            (1) an employee of the Illinois Department of 18        Transportation who is a registered professional 19        engineer under the Professional Engineering Practice 20        Act of 1989 or an employee of the Illinois Department 21        of Transportation that is and co-signed, with a 22        license number affixed, by another employee of the 23        Illinois Department of Transportation and who is a 24        registered professional engineer under the 25        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, with a 26        license number affixed;  HB4950 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1            (2) a person who: (i) has at least 2 years' 2        experience in a field closely related to real estate; 3        (ii) has completed a minimum of 45 hours of course work 4        in real estate appraisal, including the principles of 5        real estate appraisals, appraisal of partial 6        acquisitions, easement valuation, reviewing appraisals 7        in eminent domain, appraisal for federal aid highway 8        programs, or appraisal review for federal aid highway 9        programs; and (iii) is an employee of the Illinois 10        Department of Transportation or an employee of a 11        consultant or subconsultant under contract to provide 12        land acquisition services to the Illinois Department 13        of Transportation;14            (3) a county or municipal engineer who is a 15        registered professional engineer under the 16        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, with an 17        engineer's signature and license number affixed;18            (4) a municipal engineer who has completed 19        coursework that is sufficient for waiver valuations to 20        be approved by the Federal Highway Administration and 21        who is a registered professional engineer under the 22        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989;23            (5) or (2) an employee of a county or municipality 24        that is and co-signed with a license number affixed by 25        its respective a county or municipal engineer who is a 26        registered professional engineer under the   HB4950 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, with a 2        license number affixed;3            (6) an employee of a municipality who:4                (A) has completed a minimum of 45 hours of 5            coursework in real estate appraisal, including the 6            principles of real estate appraisals, appraisal of 7            partial acquisitions, easement valuation, 8            reviewing appraisals in eminent domain, appraisal 9            for federal aid highway programs, and appraisal 10            review for federal aid highway programs; and11                (B) has either 2 years of experience in a 12            field clearly related to real estate or has 13            completed 20 hours of additional coursework that 14            is sufficient for the employee to complete waiver 15            valuations as approved by the Federal Highway 16            Administration; or17            (7) a nonresident appraiser licensed in another 18        jurisdiction who does not represent himself or herself 19        to be an Illinois-licensed appraiser; or and20        (B) a waiver valuation waiver in an amount not to 21    exceed $50,000 that (1) is performed by a licensed 22    certified general real estate appraiser, a licensed 23    certified residential real estate appraiser, or an 24    associate real estate trainee appraiser employed by the 25    Illinois Department of Transportation, (2) includes the 26    signature and license numbers of the appraiser or the   HB4950 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1    trainee and the trainee's supervising appraiser, and (3) 2    is co-signed by an employee of the Illinois Department of 3    Transportation who is a registered professional engineer 4    under the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, 5    with a license number affixed $20,000 prepared pursuant to 6    the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real 7    Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, or prepared 8    pursuant to the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and 9    Real Property Acquisition for Federal and 10    Federally-Assisted Programs regulations and which is 11    performed by a county or municipal engineer who is 12    employed by a county or municipality and is a registered 13    professional engineer under the Professional Engineering 14    Practice Act of 1989. The valuation shall include the 15    county or municipal engineer's signature and license 16    number.17    Nothing in this subsection (e-5) shall be construed to 18allow the State of Illinois, a political subdivision thereof, 19or any public body to acquire real estate by eminent domain in 20any manner other than provided for in the Eminent Domain Act.21    Any person who is certified or licensed under this Act and 22performs a waiver valuation in accordance with (1) the 23requirements of this subsection (e-5) and (2) the federal 24Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition 25Policies Act of 1970, as amended, or pursuant to the federal 26Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition   HB4950 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1for Federal and Federally Assisted Programs regulations under 249 CFR Part 24 shall be exempt from adherence to all relevant 3provisions of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal 4Practice while conducting waiver valuations in accordance with 5State and federal law. Nothing in this Act shall be construed 6to exempt any person who is certified or licensed under this 7Act from adhering to the Uniform Standards of Professional 8Appraisal Practice while conducting appraisals in accordance 9with this Act.10    (f) A State real estate appraisal certification or license 11is not required under this Act for any person, partnership, 12association, or corporation that performs appraisals of 13property owned by that person, partnership, association, or 14corporation for the sole use of that person, partnership, 15association, or corporation. 16    Any person who is certified or licensed under this Act and 17who performs any of the activities set forth in this 18subsection (f) must comply with the provisions of this Act. A 19person who violates this subsection (f) is guilty of a Class A 20misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony for any 21subsequent offense.22    (g) This Act does not apply to an employee, officer, 23director, or member of a credit or loan committee of a 24financial institution or any other person engaged by a 25financial institution when performing an evaluation of real 26property for the sole use of the financial institution in a   HB4950 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1transaction for which the financial institution would not be 2required to use the services of a State licensed or State 3certified appraiser pursuant to federal regulations adopted 4under Title XI of the federal Financial Institutions Reform, 5Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.6    (h) This Act does not apply to the procurement of an 7automated valuation model. 8(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 9    Section 15. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 10changing Section 4-501 as follows: 11    (605 ILCS 5/4-501)  (from Ch. 121, par. 4-501)12    Sec. 4-501. The Department, in its name, or any county may 13acquire the fee simple title, or such lesser interest as may be 14desired, to any public or private land, rights, or other 15property necessary for the construction, maintenance or 16operation of State highways, or necessary for locating, 17relocating, extending, widening or straightening any State 18highway, or necessary for locating, relocating, extending, 19widening or straightening an existing street or for laying 20out, establishing or opening a new street within the corporate 21limits of any municipality which has been designated by the 22Department as a street to form a part of or to connect with a 23State highway leading up to the corporate limits of such 24municipality, or necessary for any other purpose or use   HB4950 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1contemplated by this Code by purchase or by the exercise of the 2right of eminent domain under the eminent domain laws of this 3State and the Department shall not be required, in any case, to 4furnish bond.5    When, in the judgment of the acquiring agency, it is more 6practical and economical to acquire the fee to the 7inaccessible remnants of the tracts of land from which 8rights-of-way are being acquired than to pay severance 9damages, such agency may do so by purchase or by an eminent 10domain proceeding.11    When a part of a parcel of land is to be taken for State 12highway purposes and the accessible remnant is to be left in a 13shape or condition rendering it of little value to the owner or 14giving rise to claims for severance or other damages, upon 15written request of the owner, the acquiring agency may take 16the whole parcel and may sell or exchange the part not needed 17for highway purposes.18    When acquiring land for a highway on a new location, and 19when a parcel of land one acre or less in area contains a 20single family residence, which is in conformance with existing 21zoning ordinances, and only a part of that parcel is required 22for State highway purposes causing the remainder of the parcel 23not to conform with the existing zoning ordinances, or when 24the location of the right of way line of the proposed highway 25reduces the distance from an existing single family residence 26to the right of way line to 10 feet or less, the acquiring   HB4950 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 19990 AAS 33441 b1agency shall, if the owner so demands, take the whole parcel by 2negotiation or condemnation. The part not needed for highway 3purposes may be rented, sold or exchanged by the acquiring 4agency.5    When any farm land is acquired for State highway purposes 6by the exercise of the right of eminent domain, the rate of 7compensation to be paid by the acquiring agency shall be 8computed by taking into consideration the total acreage 9originally involved in the farm land parcel, including that 10portion of such parcel already part of a right of way for 11highway purposes but for which legal title lies in the owner of 12the parcel.13(Source: P.A. 81-536.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.